Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 5. Judicial Department

§ 1. How judicial power vested.

The judicial power of the state shall be vested in the senate, sitting as a court of impeachment, in a supreme court, district courts, and such subordinate courts as the legislature may, by general law, establish and ordain from time to time. (As amended by Laws 1965, Senate Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 518.)

Cross references. —

For provision that the constitution of the United States shall be the supreme law of the land, see art. 1, § 37, Wyo. Const.

As to probate courts, see §§

2-2-101

to

2-2-404

.

As to courts generally, see title 5.

As to juvenile courts, see §§

14-6-201

through

14-6-252

.

Term “district court” is used in a broad or inclusive sense

as if there were one district court in a given judicial district for several counties, and as if there were one district court in a given county for the several jurisdictions such as civil, criminal and probate. Gaunt v. Kansas Univ. Endowment Ass'n, 379 P.2d 825,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 1963).

Effect of 1967 amendment to this article on art. 3, §§ 18 and 19, Wyo. Const. —

The provisions of art. 3, §§ 18 and 19, Wyo. Const., as they relate to justices of the peace were repealed by implication when the 1965 constitutional amendment to this article became effective in 1967. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

The provisions of art. 3, §§ 18 and 19, Wyo. Const., as they relate to impeachment of justices of the peace, are irreconcilable with the 1965 constitutional amendment to this article, which eliminated justice of the peace courts from the constitution. In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Office of justice of the peace is legislative, not constitutional, office. —

See In re Johnson, 568 P.2d 855,

1977 Wyo. LEXIS 313

(Wyo. 1977).

Powers conferred on board of control do not violate section. —

The powers conferred upon the board of control in regard to water appropriations was not in violation of this section. Farm Inv. Co. v. Carpenter, 9 Wyo. 110, 61 P. 258,

1900 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1900).

But jurisdiction of board of control is not exclusive. —

The state board of control is not vested with exclusive jurisdiction of actions to determine priority of water rights, and such actions may be brought in courts. Simmons v. Ramsbottom, 51 Wyo. 419, 68 P.2d 153,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1937).

Statute requiring dipping of sheep not invalid delegation of power. —

Former statute, providing for compulsory dipping of all sheep kept or herded within the state, whether diseased or not, done under supervision of an inspector, was not invalid as reposing judicial powers in an administrative officer contrary to this section. State v. Hall, 27 Wyo. 224, 194 P. 476,

1920 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1920).

Statute empowering board of charities and reform to transfer prisoner in industrial institute to penitentiary

if it should appear that he had been previously convicted of crime was not unconstitutional as a delegation of judicial functions to an executive board. Uram v. Roach, 47 Wyo. 335, 37 P.2d 793,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 27

(Wyo. 1934).

Condemnation procedure

authorized by act authorizing city to condemn land for waterworks was not violative of this or of any other provision of the constitution. Edwards v. Cheyenne, 19 Wyo. 110, 114 P. 677,

1911 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 1911), reh'g denied, 19 Wyo. 110, 122 P. 900,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1912).

Jurisdiction of district court on appeal from board of land commissioners. —

District court is without jurisdiction on appeal from board of land commissioners unless appeal comes within provision of statute. State ex rel. Walls v. District Court, 38 Wyo. 427, 267 P. 1060,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1928).

Authority of judge at chambers to punish for contempt. —

A judge at chambers has no authority without express authority of law to punish for a contempt not committed in his presence. Mau v. Stoner, 12 Wyo. 478, 76 P. 584,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1904), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218 (Wyo. 1905).

Territorial judge refusing to deliver records. —

A territorial probate judge who refused to deliver his records to the district judge under statehood may be punished for contempt. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Jurisdiction over same-sex divorce action. —

District court had subject-matter jurisdiction pursuant to Wyo. Const. art. 5, § 10, this section, and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-2-104

over a divorce action involving a same-sex couple legally married in Canada. Recognizing the marriage under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-111

for this limited purpose was not inconsistent with the definition of marriage in Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

20-1-101

.
Christiansen v. Christiansen, 2011 WY 90, 253 P.3d 153,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 93

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962); Nollsch v. City of Rock Springs, 724 P.2d 447,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 603

(Wyo. 1986); Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Best v. Best, 2015 WY 133,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Sept. 30, 2015).

Quoted

in

Lapp v. City of Worland, 612 P.2d 868,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1980); Bi-Rite Package, Inc. v. District Court, 735 P.2d 709,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 423

(Wyo. 1987); Foster v. Foster, 768 P.2d 1038,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. 1989).

Cited

in

Dawson v. City of Casper, 731 P.2d 1186,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 389

(Wyo. 1987); Katona v. City of Cheyenne, 686 F. Supp. 287, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4215 (D. Wyo. 1988); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004); Granite Springs Retreat Ass'n v. Manning, 2006 WY 60, 133 P.3d 1005,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. May 12, 2006); Harmon v. Star Valley Med. Ctr., 2014 WY 90,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Jul 16, 2014).

Law reviews. —

For note, “Constitutional Law — Due Process — Replevin —
Right to Notice and Hearing Prior to Deprivation of Property. Fuentes v. Shevin, 407 U.S. 67, 32 L. Ed. 2d 556, 92 S. Ct. 1983, 1972 U.S. LEXIS 42 (1972),” see VIII Land & Water L. Rev. 315 (1973).

For comment, “The Institutional Transfer Statute: Three Challenges to the Imprisonment of Juvenile Offenders,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 643 (1982).

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

For article, “Journey for the Pole: The Life and Times of Fred H. Blume, Justice of the Wyoming Supreme Court,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 511 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Applicability of judicial immunity to acts of clerk of court under state law, 34 ALR4th 1186.

§ 2. Supreme court generally; appellate jurisdiction.

The supreme court shall have general appellate jurisdiction, co-extensive with the state, in both civil and criminal causes, and shall have a general superintending control over all inferior courts, under such rules and regulations as may be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to appeals from district courts to supreme court, see art. 5, § 18, Wyo. Const., and Rules 1.01 to 29 W.R.A.P.

As to reservation of difficult constitutional questions to the supreme court by the district court, see §

1-13-101

.

As to supreme court generally, see §§

5-2-101

to

5-2-502

.

As to rules of the supreme court, see Rules 1 to 9, Sup. Ct.

Scope of court's authority. —

Supreme court is clothed with appellate jurisdiction in criminal as well as civil causes. In re Boulter, 5 Wyo. 263, 39 P. 875,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1895).

Prescribe by law. —

Power of the legislature to “prescribe by law” is not unrestricted; laws may be enacted that do not interfere with the constitutional or inherent authority of the courts, but statutes that interfere with that authority are unconstitutional, and this concept is applicable to constitutionally created executive branch offices.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Duty of court. —

Because the supreme court has general superintending control over all the courts of the state and the Wyoming judicial system in general, it is the court's duty to protect its integrity and prohibit dealing lightly with its proceedings. Allen v. Allen, 550 P.2d 1137,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1976).

Superintending control sparingly used. —

It is the policy of this court that the general superintending control given by this section be sparingly used. Mott v. England, 604 P.2d 560,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 506

(Wyo. 1979).

Courts' right to prescribe rules. —

The courts have inherent rights to prescribe rules, limited only by their reasonableness and conformity to constitutional and legislative enactments that deal with the substantive rights of persons or the jurisdiction of a court. Petersen v. State, 594 P.2d 978,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 411

(Wyo. 1979).

Superintending control encompasses rulemaking. —

The general superintending control over all inferior courts granted to the supreme court encompasses the authority to prescribe rules of practice and procedure in those courts. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984); Squillace v. Kelley, 990 P.2d 497,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1999).

In accord with bound volume. Squillace v. Kelley, 990 P.2d 497,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 173

(Wyo. 1999).

Supreme court has plenary power to control course of litigation

in trial courts. State ex rel. Jones v. District Court, 37 Wyo. 516, 263 P. 700,

1928 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1928).

Legislative regulation of entry on pleadings. —

The legislature is constitutionally prohibited from enacting statutes specifying the content of or foreclosing material from pleadings, as these are procedural matters. White v. Fisher, 689 P.2d 102,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 341

(Wyo. 1984).

District employees without property right in employment. —

Because each district court judge has authority over the personnel rules of his or her court, there being no evidence that the Wyoming judicial conference ever adopted the supreme court's personnel rules as a whole to apply to district court employees, retired district court judge's former secretary had no property in her continued employment on the basis of the supreme court rules. Munroe v. Kautz, 833 F. Supp. 854, 1993 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 13660 (D. Wyo. 1993), aff'd, 33 F.3d 62, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 30842 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

Right of appeal to supreme court is not guaranteed in all cases.

Mau v. Stoner, 14 Wyo. 183, 83 P. 218,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 1905).

And its jurisdiction is limited. —

The supreme court is essentially a court of review with reference to cases where original jurisdiction is lodged exclusively in a lower court and in that sense its jurisdiction is limited. State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1909).

Restrictions on right of appeal not permitted. —

The supreme court would be remiss in its duty if it permitted district courts to include provisions in their judgments which might restrict a party's right of appeal or in any manner penalize a party for exercising his right of appeal. Beckle v. Beckle, 452 P.2d 205,

1969 Wyo. LEXIS 125

(Wyo. 1969).

Review of action of district court on appeal from police court. —

Supreme court may issue a writ of certiorari to review the action of the district court in reviewing a conviction for violation of a city ordinance, which was appealed from police court.
Sheridan v. Cadle, 24 Wyo. 293, 157 P. 892,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1916).

Appeal from judgment entered by district court in vacation. —

An appeal may be taken from a judgment entered by the district court in vacation. Anderson v. Matthews, 8 Wyo. 307, 57 P. 156,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1899).

Injunction issued by district court in pending cause. —

The supreme court has no jurisdiction to vacate or modify an injunction issued by the district court in a cause pending before it. Smith v. Healy, 12 Wyo. 218, 75 P. 430,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1904).

Test of court's jurisdiction through writ of prohibition inappropriate. —

Since a lower court does have authority to close pretrial hearings under certain circumstances, a test of the court's jurisdiction to do so through an application for writ of prohibition is inappropriate, as the issuance of such a writ is closely guarded so as not to disrupt, unless absolutely necessary, the usual course of judicial proceedings. Williams v. Stafford, 589 P.2d 322,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 342

(Wyo. 1979), overruled, Vaughn v. State, 962 P.2d 149,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 1998).

Supreme court cannot supersede statutory jury-trial right

through exercise of its rule-making power. Goodman v. State, 644 P.2d 1240,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 339

(Wyo. 1982).

When constitutionality of statute passed on. —

The constitutionality of a statute will not be passed on unless the decision is necessary to the determination of the pending controversy. State v. Kelley, 17 Wyo. 335, 98 P. 886,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1909).

Supreme court is at liberty to decide a case upon any point which the ends of justice require,

particularly on a point so fundamental that it must take cognizance of it. Allen v. Allen, 550 P.2d 1137,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 200

(Wyo. 1976).

Judgment vacated for gross miscarriage of justice. —

An erroneous judgment was vacated, with an order directing the reassignment of the case to another judge, where the supreme court's conclusion as to the privileged nature of documents sought to be produced in discovery was diametrically opposite to that apparently reached by the district court, and the judgment was a gross miscarriage of justice.
Continental Ins. Co. v. First Wyo. Bank, N.A. - Jackson Hole, 771 P.2d 374,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1989).

Moot case. —

Although a case had become moot in character through lapse of time, under the mandate of this section, the supreme court would consider and dispose of it, where matters of general public interest likely to arise again were concerned, for the guidance of administrative agencies and in order to produce uniformity in the decisions of the special district courts thereafter.
Morad v. Wyoming Highway Dep't, 66 Wyo. 12, 203 P.2d 954,

1949 Wyo. LEXIS 1

(Wyo. 1949).

Questions as to bail certified from district court. —

The supreme court has jurisdiction of questions certified from the district court as to whether a person indicted for murder should be admitted to bail. State v. Crocker, 5 Wyo. 385, 40 P. 681,

1895 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1895).

Modification of verdict in criminal case. —

Modification by appellate court of verdict of murder in second degree to one of manslaughter was authorized and not infringement of due process or right to jury trial. State v. Sorrentino, 36 Wyo. 111, 253 P. 14,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 1927).

New trial where party deprived of opportunity for review without his fault. —

Where, after instituting proceedings in error in criminal case, defendant was prevented, without fault on his part, from obtaining bill of exceptions through the accidental loss of the testimony by the official stenographer, and a bill of exceptions was necessary to a review of the errors assigned in the motion for a new trial, the supreme court had jurisdiction to vacate the judgment and grant new trial. Richardson v. State, 15 Wyo. 465, 89 P. 1027,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1907).

Divorce cases. —

In proceeding in error to review trial court's refusal to grant a divorce, supreme court had jurisdiction to consider a motion for an allowance for the support of wife and child pending the proceedings and for reasonable allowance for expenses. Duxstad v. Duxstad, 16 Wyo. 396, 94 P. 463,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1908).

The supreme court may compel a husband, who is prosecuting a proceeding in error to judgment for separate maintenance, to pay his wife reasonable sum for attorney's fees in the appellate court. Brown v. Brown, 22 Wyo. 92, 135 P. 801,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1913).

Grounds for dismissal of proceeding before supreme court. —

Failure to file petition in error within the statutory period, after denial of motion for a new trial, is ground for dismissal of proceedings.
In re Bosick, 48 Wyo. 46, 41 P.2d 533,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1935).

Applied

in

Thomas v. Justice Court, 538 P.2d 42,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1975); Nicholaus v. Nicholaus, 756 P.2d 1338,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 1988); Gillis v. F & A Enters., 813 P.2d 1304,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 1991); Terex Corp. v. Hough, 2002 WY 112, 50 P.3d 317,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Wyo. 2002).

Quoted

in

Application of Stone, 74 Wyo. 389, 288 P.2d 767,

1955 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(1955);
Bi-Rite Package, Inc. v. District Court, 735 P.2d 709,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 423

(Wyo. 1987); Reynolds v. Bonar, 2013 WY 144, 313 P.3d 501,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 150

, 2013 WL 6122405 (Nov 21, 2013).

Stated

in

Hoem v. State, 756 P.2d 780,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1988).

Cited

in

Murdock v. State, 351 P.2d 674,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 59

(Wyo. 1960); Katona v. City of Cheyenne, 686 F. Supp. 287, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 4215 (D. Wyo. 1988); Osborn v. Emporium Videos, 848 P.2d 237,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 47

(Wyo. 1993); Lowseth v. State, 875 P.2d 725,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Wyo. 1994); Kittles v. Rocky Mt. Recovery, Inc., 1 P.3d 1220,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2000); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Supreme Court Jurisdiction and the Wyoming Constitution: Justice v. Judicial Restraint,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 159 (1985).

For comment, “Reforming Criminal Sentencing in Wyoming,” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 575 (1985).

For case note, “Criminal Procedure — The State's Right to Appeal in Criminal Cases, State v. Heiner, 683 P.2d 629,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 284

(Wyo. 1984),” see XX Land & Water L. Rev. 723 (1985).

For article, “An Essay on Wyoming Constitutional Interpretation,” see XXI Land & Water L. Rev. 527 (1986).

For case note, “Appeal and Error—The Omnipotent Wyoming Supreme Court: New Allegations and Evidence Will Be Heard for the First Time on Appeal. Boller v. Western Law Associates, 828 P.2d 1184,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 38

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 677 (1993).